Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-2622
Act, how construed.

The Uniform Arbitration Act shall be so construed as to effectuate its general purpose to make uniform the law of those states which enact it.

Laws 1987, LB 71, § 22.